Utah statutes.
4-38-16.   Horse Racing Account created -- Contents -- Use of account
monies.
(1)  There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as
the Horse Racing Account.
(2)  The Horse Racing Account consists of:
(a)  license fees collected under this chapter;
(b)  revenue from fines imposed under this chapter; and
(c)  interest on account monies.
(3)  Upon appropriation by the Legislature, monies from the account shall be
used for the administration of this chapter, including paying the costs of:
(a)  public liability insurance;
(b)  stewards;
(c)  veterinarians; and
(d)  drug testing.
